Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1151
Office of Oral Health and Dentistry; duties; rules and regulations.

The duties of the Office of Oral Health and Dentistry shall be the promotion and development of activities which will result in the practice and improvement of the dental health of the people of the state under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 1949, c. 201, § 3, p. 585;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 412;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 84;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-193.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 484.